District of Columbia statutes.
47-861

Violations.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, or in other provisions of law applicable to the District of Columbia, the Council may by regulation establish penalties for violations of any provisions of this chapter, including any regulation issued pursuant to this chapter. Such penalties may not exceed imprisonment for longer than 1 year, or a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or both, for each offense.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1065, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 477
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2177, Pub. L. 93-635, § 8(d)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(g), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 47-861.
1973 Ed., § 47-661.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not to exceed $10,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.